Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Housing and  Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $162,221,112.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$646,874,898 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses for operations, from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscel-
laneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in this section, collected or  received by the Housing and Community Services De-
partment.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$28,443,620 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Housing and Community Services  Department for lottery
bonds.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$402,036,303 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds other  than those described in section 2 of this 2023
Act collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 5. There is  appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $116,081,170
for debt service for bond-related activities.
SECTION 6. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, expenditures by the Housing and
Community Services Department for the following are not limited:
(1) Payments for costs resulting from the sale and issuance or redemption of  bonds is-
sued under ORS 287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650 (2005 Edition).
(2) Payment of debt service  and redemption premium on bonds issued under ORS
287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650  (2005 Edition) and payments for the purchase of bonds
as provided in ORS 456.680.
(3) Loans and payments for purchasing, insuring and servicing loans  as provided in ORS
456.625, 456.627, 456.635, 456.690, 456.705, 456.715  and 456.717 and payments for the purchase
Enrolled Senate Bill 5511 (SB 5511-A) Page 1
from lending institutions of securities backed  by residential loans as provided in ORS 456.635
(1).
(4) Advances for development costs made in accordance with ORS 456.710.
(5) Pass-through payments  of federal rent subsidy moneys from the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development.
(6) Payments for costs associated with asset protection.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $105,300,000 to increase shelter  capacity and
connections to shelter and to support rapid rehousing initiatives for communities in  desig-
nated homeless emergency areas based on local plans submitted to the department.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $7,500,000, for deposit into the Housing Fi-
nance Fund established by ORS 456.720 for down payment  assistance to be paired with
Housing and Community Services Department loan products.
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $4,000,000 for deposit into the General
Housing Account established by ORS 458.620 for stabilization of operating costs for  perma-
nent supportive housing financed by the department.
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $9,700,000 for deposit into the General
Housing Account  established by ORS 458.620 for predevelopment loans to developers of af-
fordable housing financed through the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 11. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $2,500,000 for deposit into the Manu-
factured Home Preservation Fund established by ORS 458.366 for decommissioning,  repair
and replacement of manufactured housing.
SECTION 12. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000 for grants to the Oregon Law
Center, Community  Alliance of Tenants and Springfield Eugene Tenants Association for
tenant resources, including but not limited to tenant education, resource navigation  and re-
ferrals, and eviction prevention services.
SECTION 13. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5511 (SB 5511-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5511 (SB 5511-A) Page 3